Hawaii statutes.
§710-1029 Hindering prosecution in the
first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of hindering prosecution
in the first degree if, with the intent to hinder the apprehension,
prosecution, conviction, or punishment of another for a class A, B, or C felony
or murder in any degree, the person renders assistance to the other person.

(2) Hindering prosecution in the first degree
is a class C felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 149, §6]

Case Notes

Although there was insufficient evidence to support a
conviction for hindering prosecution in the first degree, there was sufficient
evidence adduced to convict petitioner of the lesser included offense of
hindering prosecution in the second degree under §710-1030; evidence was
adduced that petitioner used physical force to prevent the officers from
pursuing petitioner's son, the officers were acting under the color of law, and
the officers informed petitioner that they were seeking to arrest son, which
was sufficient evidence that petitioner was aware of the attendant circumstance
that son was being apprehended for "a crime". 121 H. 74, 214 P.3d
613 (2009).

Where there was no evidence presented that petitioner was
aware of the attendant circumstance that petitioner's son committed a felony,
there was an insufficient basis for petitioner's conviction of a felony under
this section. 121 H. 74, 214 P.3d 613 (2009).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next